District of Columbia statutes.
2-1223.13

Repealed

Subsidiaries.

Repealed.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 113, 51 DCR 9142
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 14(c), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 104(a), 55 DCR 1689
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 113 of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).

Resolution 16-701, the “Southwest Waterfront Subsidiaries Establishment Approval Resolution of 2006”, was approved effective July 7, 2006.

Resolution 16-700, the “Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Nonprofit Subsidiary Establishment Approval Resolution of 2006”, was approved effective July 7, 2006.